Utah statutes.
75-5-431.   Payment of debt and delivery of property to foreign conservator
without local proceedings.
(1) Any person indebted to a protected person, or having possession of
property or of an instrument evidencing a debt, stock, or chose in action
belonging to a protected person, may pay or deliver to a conservator, guardian
of the estate, or other like fiduciary appointed by a court of the state of
residence of the protected person, upon being presented with proof of his
appointment and an affidavit made by him or on his behalf stating:
(a)  That no protective proceeding relating to the protected person is pending
in this state; and
(b)  That the foreign conservator is entitled to payment or to receive
delivery.
(2)  If the person to whom the affidavit is presented is not aware of any
protective proceeding pending in this state, payment or delivery in response
to the demand and affidavit discharges the debtor or possessor.
